New York, session 2025-2026, A9652.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 5 of chapter 282 of the laws of 2003, amending the 2 town law relating to authorizing the town of Brookhaven, in the county 3 of Suffolk, to establish a community preservation fund and amending the 4 tax law relating to authorizing such town to impose a real estate trans- 5 fer tax with revenues therefrom to be deposited in such community pres- 6 ervation fund, is amended to read as follows: 7 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that article 8 31-B of the tax law, as added by section three of this act, shall remain 9 in full force and effect until December 31, [2025] 2045 when upon such 10 date the provisions of such section three of this act shall expire and 11 be deemed repealed, provided however, that the tax authorized by section 12 three of this act shall not take effect before July 1, 2003. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 14 if this act shall have become a law on or after December 31, 2025 this 15 act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to have been in 16 full force and effect on and after December 31, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13914-01-5